Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2546.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5301 of Title 74 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5301. Authority of department.* * *(f) Automatic dependent surveillance broadcasts.--(1) An airport and aviation retail establishment, including a third-party vendor of an airport or aviation retail establishment, may not use information broadcast or collected by an automatic dependent surveillance broadcast, regardless of whether the information originates from an ADS-1234567891011121314151617 B In or ADS-B Out service, as a means for calculating, generating and collecting fees from aircraft owners or operators who operate aircraft within the geographic boundary of this Commonwealth.(2) A violation of this subsection shall constitute a violation of the act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law. The Office of Attorney General shall have the powers and duties under the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law necessary to enforce this subsection.(3) As used in this subsection, the term "automatic dependent surveillance broadcast" or "ADS-B" means an advanced aviation surveillance technology that combines an aircraft's positioning source, aircraft avionics and ground infrastructure to create an accurate surveillance interface between an aircraft and air traffic control. The term includes an ADS-B In system and ADS-B Out system that provide information such as an aircraft's global positioning system location, altitude, ground speed, weather, traffic information and other data to ground stations and other aircraft.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2546PN3454 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122